Washington statutes.
RCW 19.225.070

Notice to educational institution.

(1) In this section, "communicating or attempting to communicate" means contacting or attempting to contact by an in-person meeting, a record, or any other method that conveys or attempts to convey a message.

(2) Not later than seventy-two hours prior to entering into an agency contract and again not later than seventy-two hours after entering into an agency contract, or before the next scheduled athletic event in which the student athlete may participate, whichever occurs first, the athlete agent shall give notice in a record of the existence of the contract to the athletic director of the educational institution at which the athlete is enrolled or at which the athlete agent has reasonable grounds to believe the athlete intends to enroll.

(3) Not later than seventy-two hours prior to entering into an agency contract and again not later than seventy-two hours after entering into an agency contract or before the next scheduled athletic event in which the student athlete may participate, whichever occurs first, the athlete shall inform the athletic director of the educational institution at which the athlete is enrolled that the athlete has entered into an agency contract and the name and contact information of the athlete agent.

(4) If an athlete agent enters into an agency contract with a student athlete and the athlete subsequently enrolls at an educational institution, the athlete agent shall notify the athletic director of the institution of the existence of the contract not later than seventy-two hours after the athlete agent knew or should have known the athlete enrolled.

(5) If an athlete agent has a relationship with a student athlete before the athlete enrolls in an educational institution and receives an athletic scholarship from the institution, the athlete agent shall notify the institution of the relationship not later than ten days after the enrollment if the athlete agent knows or should have known of the enrollment and:

(a) The relationship was motivated in whole or part by the intention of the athlete agent to recruit or solicit the athlete to enter an agency contract in the future; or

(b) The athlete agent directly or indirectly recruited or solicited the athlete to enter an agency contract before the enrollment.

(6) An athlete agent shall give notice in a record to the athletic director of any educational institution at which a student athlete is enrolled before the athlete agent communicates or attempts to communicate with:

(a) The athlete or, if the athlete is a minor, a parent or guardian of the athlete, to influence the athlete or parent or guardian to enter into an agency contract; or

(b) Another individual to have that individual influence the athlete or, if the athlete is a minor, the parent or guardian of the athlete to enter into an agency contract.

(7) If a communication or attempt to communicate with an athlete agent is initiated by a student athlete or another individual on behalf of the athlete, the athlete agent shall notify in a record the athletic director of any educational institution at which the athlete is enrolled. The notification must be made not later than ten days after the communication or attempt.

(8) An educational institution that becomes aware of a violation of chapter 13, Laws of 2016 sp. sess. by an athlete agent shall notify any professional league or players association with which the institution is aware the athlete agent is licensed or registered of the violation.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 13 s 7; 2002 c 131 s 8.]